Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1905.01
Limited computed tomography radiographer, defined.

Limited computed tomography radiographer means a person licensed pursuant to section 38-1917.01 to practice medical radiography restricted to computed tomography.

Laws 2008, LB928, § 8.